test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-F-С_Д-яйцо_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - яйцо M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      яйцо+N+Neu+Sg+Nom: яйцо́
      яйцо+N+Neu+Sg+Acc: яйцо́
      яйцо+N+Neu+Sg+Gen: яйца́
      яйцо+N+Neu+Sg+Loc: яйце́
      яйцо+N+Neu+Sg+Dat: яйцу́
      яйцо+N+Neu+Sg+Ins: яйцо́м
      яйцо+N+Neu+Pl+Nom: я́йца
      яйцо+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Inan: я́йца
      яйцо+N+Neu+Pl+Gen: яи́ц
      яйцо+N+Neu+Pl+Loc: я́йцах
      яйцо+N+Neu+Pl+Dat: я́йцам
      яйцо+N+Neu+Pl+Ins: я́йцами
